North Carolina, session 2025, HB721.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to Muddy Sneakers, Inc., to support its experiential learning
programs that aim to improve the science aptitude of fifth grade students through supplemental,
hands-on field instruction of the State science standards.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($2,750,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
St. Gerard House, a nonprofit organization, to be used to support its programs to treat autism.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H721-v-1*